Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-1205
Credit facility or related agreement;
payments authorized.

Any
credit facility or related agreement may provide for payment of amounts owing
by the governmental unit from any resources of the governmental unit as may
be deemed appropriate by the governing body, including taxes and other revenue.
Any amounts required to reimburse the provider of a credit facility for amounts
advanced for payment of principal and interest or for purchase of a bond or
for related fees and expenses shall have the same status under sections 13-520
and 77-3442 as the indebtedness for which the credit facility has been provided.
Such indebtedness includes, without limitation, the payments of principal
and interest for which the advance or purchase was made or the fees and expenses
incurred.

Laws 2009, LB377, § 5.